Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4860
Continuation of proceedings under prior law.

Every proceeding commenced under the laws in effect before May 26, 1989, shall be deemed to have commenced under the Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act for the purpose of conducting the proceeding henceforth, except that in the discretion of the director the proceeding may be continued, in whole or in part, as it would have been continued had the act not been enacted.

Laws 1989, LB 319, § 60.